Utah statutes.
68-3-13.   Printing boldface in numbered bills -- Purpose -- Effect -- Power of Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel to change.

A short summary of each section, part, chapter, or title, called boldface, may be printed in numbered bills introduced in the Legislature.  This boldface is not law; it is intended only to highlight the content of each section, part, chapter, or title for legislators.  Inaccurate boldface is not a basis for invalidating legislation.  The Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel is authorized in Section 36-12-12 to change the boldface in the enrolling process so that it more accurately reflects the substance of each section, part, chapter, or title.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1989 General Session

